german_compound/german.aff
flag *m:
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHER
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHERE
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHEREN
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHEREM
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHERER
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHERES
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHSTE
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHSTEN
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHSTEM
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHSTEN
   ACH    > -ACH,äCHSTES
   AH    > -AH,äHER
   AH    > -AH,äHERE
   AH    > -AH,äHEREN
   AH    > -AH,äHEREM
   AH    > -AH,äHERER
   AH    > -AH,äHERES
   AH    > -AH,äHSTE
   AH    > -AH,äHSTEN
   AH    > -AH,äHSTEM
   AH    > -AH,äHSTEN
   AH    > -AH,äHSTES
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTER
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTERE
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTEREN
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTEREM
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTERER
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTERES
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTESTE
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTESTEN
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTESTEM
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTESTEN
   ALT    > -ALT,äLTESTES
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGER
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGERE
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGEREN
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGEREM
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGERER
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGERES
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGESTE
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGESTEN
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGESTEM
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGESTEN
   ARG    > -ARG,äRGESTES
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSER
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSERE
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSEREN
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSEREM
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSERER
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSERES
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSESTE
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSESTEN
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSESTEM
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSESTEN
   ASS    > -ASS,äSSESTES
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSER
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSERE
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSEREN
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSEREM
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSERER
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSERES
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSESTE
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSESTEN
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSESTEM
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSESTEN
   Aß    > -Aß,äSSESTES
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGER
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGERE
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGEREN
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGEREM
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGERER
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGERES
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGSTE
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGSTEN
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGSTEM
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGSTEN
   ANG    > -ANG,äNGSTES
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKER
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKERE
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKEREN
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKEREM
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKERER
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKERES
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKSTE
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKSTEN
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKSTEM
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKSTEN
   ANK    > -ANK,äNKSTES
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKER
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKERE
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKEREN
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKEREM
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKERER
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKERES
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKSTE
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKSTEN
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKSTEM
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKSTEN
   ARK    > -ARK,äRKSTES
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMER
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMERE
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMEREN
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMEREM
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMERER
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMERES
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMSTE
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMSTEN
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMSTEM
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMSTEN
   ARM    > -ARM,äRMSTES
   ART    > -ART,äRTER
   ART    > -ART,äRTERE
   ART    > -ART,äRTEREN
   ART    > -ART,äRTEREM
   ART    > -ART,äRTERER
   ART    > -ART,äRTERES
   ART    > -ART,äRTESTE
   ART    > -ART,äRTESTEN
   ART    > -ART,äRTESTEM
   ART    > -ART,äRTESTEN
   ART    > -ART,äRTESTES
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSER
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSERE
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSEREN
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSEREM
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSERER
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSERES
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSTE
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSTEN
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSTEM
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSTEN
   Oß    > -Oß,öSSTES
   Oß    > -Oß,ößER
   Oß    > -Oß,ößERE
   Oß    > -Oß,ößEREN
   Oß    > -Oß,ößEREM
   Oß    > -Oß,ößERER
   Oß    > -Oß,ößERES
   Oß    > -Oß,ößTE
   Oß    > -Oß,ößTEN
   Oß    > -Oß,ößTEM
   Oß    > -Oß,ößTEN
   Oß    > -Oß,ößTES
   OCH    > -OCH,öHER
   OCH    > -OCH,öHERE
   OCH    > -OCH,öHEREN
   OCH    > -OCH,öHEREM
   OCH    > -OCH,öHERER
   OCH    > -OCH,öHERES
   OCH    > -OCH,öHSTE
   OCH    > -OCH,öHSTEN
   OCH    > -OCH,öHSTEM
   OCH    > -OCH,öHSTEN
   OCH    > -OCH,öHSTES
   UG    > -UG,üGER
   UG    > -UG,üGERE
   UG    > -UG,üGEREN
   UG    > -UG,üGEREM
   UG    > -UG,üGERER
   UG    > -UG,üGERES
   UG    > -UG,üGSTE
   UG    > -UG,üGSTEN
   UG    > -UG,üGSTEM
   UG    > -UG,üGSTEN
   UG    > -UG,üGSTES
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMER
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMERE
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMEREN
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMEREM
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMERER
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMERES
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMSTE
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMSTEN
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMSTEM
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMSTEN
   UMM    > -UMM,üMMSTES
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGER
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGERE
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGEREN
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGEREM
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGERER
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGERES
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGSTE
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGSTEN
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGSTEM
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGSTEN
   UNG    > -UNG,üNGSTES
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZER
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZERE
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZEREN
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZEREM
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZERER
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZERES
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZESTE
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZESTEN
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZESTEM
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZESTEN
   URZ    > -URZ,üRZESTES


flag *n:
   .    > IG
   .    > IGE
   .    > IGER
   .    > IGEN
   .    > IGEM


flag *o:
   .    > E
   .    > ER
   .    > EN
   .    > EM
   .    > ES
   .    > ERE
   .    > ERER
   .    > ERES
   .    > EREM
   .    > STE
   .    > STEM
   .    > STEN
   .    > STER
   .    > ESTE
   .    > ESTEM
   .    > ESTEN
   .    > ESTER
